California statutes. Fish and Game Code
Notwithstanding Sections 6703 and 6704, at any time during the term of a lease, the commission and the lessee may negotiate and enter into a new lease on terms agreed upon between the two parties, if the commission determines that such a new lease would be in the best interest of the state. The initial term of the new lease shall not exceed 20 years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1373, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6707.

(a) Each lease shall require, in addition to the license fee required by this chapter, a payment by the lessee or any sublessee of not less than the minimum royalty established under Article 2 (commencing with Section 6680), for all kelp harvested from the lease area, and shall provide for an annual advance payment of not less than forty dollars ($40) per square mile per year for the kelp bed leased, to be credited against the amount payable by the lessee, or sublessee, as the case may be, for each ton of kelp harvested during the ensuing year.

(b) The lease shall, in addition, include provisions for forfeiture of the lease if the annual payment is not made in advance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 125.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6708.

A lease may not be assigned, in whole or in part, by the lessee, either voluntarily or by operation of law, and no subleases or other rights may be granted thereunder by the lessee without the prior approval of the commission, subject to the conditions that the commission prescribes. The lease shall be forfeited in the event of a violation of this section. Each lease shall contain a statement of the contents of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 295, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6709.

A lease, or any renewal thereof, shall be submitted to, and approved by, the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1373, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6710.

When an exclusive privilege to harvest kelp has been granted by lease by the commission, the commission shall furnish a true copy thereof to the department. The department shall file a notice for record in the recorder’s office of the county in which the kelp bed or beds, or part thereof, are located, setting forth the name of the person having the privilege, the description of the kelp bed or beds, or part thereof, and the time for which the privilege has been granted. The notice required to be filed for record under this section may be a copy of the executed lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1373, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6711.

The department shall inform the State Lands Commission of all kelp bed leases executed pursuant to this chapter, and shall furnish the State Lands Commission with the information concerning these leases that it may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1373, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Noncommercial Use of Kelp [6750. - 6751.]

6750.

The commission may regulate the taking, collecting, harvesting, gathering, or possession of kelp for purposes other than profit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 468.)
-------------------------------------------

6751.

The provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6650), Article 2 (commencing with Section 6680), and Article 3 (commencing with Section 6700) of this chapter do not apply to the taking, collecting, harvesting, gathering, or possession of kelp under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 468.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Amphibia [6850. - 6896.]



  ARTICLE 1. Frogs [6850. - 6855.]

6850.

As used in this article, “frog” means all species of frog.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

6851.

Except as otherwise provided in this code or in regulations adopted by the commission, it is unlawful to take or possess any frog for commercial purposes.

This article does not apply to frogs grown pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 16.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6852.

Any person who conducts a place of business where frogs are sold to the public for food, or who takes or possesses frogs for sale to, or for use by, educational or scientific institutions for scientific purposes, may possess only at the place of business any number of frogs which have been legally obtained pursuant to this code or regulations adopted by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

6854.

It is unlawful to take frogs by the use of firearms of any caliber or type.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

6855.

The department may issue a permit to take and dispose of frogs under such limitations as the commission may prescribe, when, in the judgment of the department, such frogs are polluting the water supply in any area, or otherwise constitute a nuisance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Frog-Jumping Contests [6880. - 6885.]

6880.

As used in this article, “frog-jumping contest” means a contest generally and popularly known as a frog-jumping contest which is open to the public and is advertised or announced in a newspaper.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6881.

Frogs to be used in frog-jumping contests shall be governed by this article only. Frogs to be so used may be taken at any time and without a license or permit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6882.

If the means used for taking such frogs can, as normally used, seriously injure the frog, it shall be conclusively presumed the taking is not for the purposes of a frog-jumping contest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6883.

Any person may possess any number of live frogs to use in frog-jumping contests, but if such a frog dies or is killed, it must be destroyed as soon as possible, and may not be eaten or otherwise used for any purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6884.

A frog which is not kept in a manner which is reasonable to preserve its life is not within the coverage of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6885.

The commission has no power to modify the provisions of this article by any order, rule, or regulation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Commercial Use of Amphibians Except Frogs [6895. - 6896.]

6895.

“Native amphibians” as used in this article means salamanders, toads, or any other member of the class amphibia native to California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 605.)
-------------------------------------------

6896.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commission shall establish rules for the commercial take, sale, transport, export, or import of native amphibians.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 605.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Salmon, Steelhead Trout, and Anadromous Fisheries Program Act [6900. - 6930.]



  ARTICLE 1. Citation and Legislative Findings [6900. - 6903.5.]

6900.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Salmon, Steelhead Trout, and Anadromous Fisheries Program Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1545, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

6901.

The Legislature, for purposes of this chapter, finds as follows:

(a) According to the department, the natural production of salmon and steelhead trout in California has declined to approximately 1,000,000 adult chinook or king salmon, 100,000 coho or silver salmon, and 150,000 steelhead trout.

(b) The naturally spawning salmon and steelhead trout resources of the state have declined dramatically within the past four decades, primarily as a result of lost stream habitat on many streams in the state.

(c) Much of the loss of salmon and steelhead trout and anadromous fish in the
 state has occurred in the central valley.

(d) Protection of, and an increase in, the naturally spawning salmon and steelhead trout resources of the state would provide a valuable public resource to the residents, a large statewide economic benefit, and would, in addition, provide employment opportunities not otherwise available to the citizens of this state, particularly in rural areas of present underemployment.

(e) Proper salmon and steelhead trout resource management requires maintaining adequate levels of natural, as compared to hatchery, spawning and rearing.

(f) Reliance upon hatchery production of salmon and steelhead trout in California is at or near the maximum percentage that it should occupy in the mix of natural and artificial hatchery production in the state. Hatchery production may be an appropriate
 means of protecting and increasing salmon and steelhead in specific situations; however, when both are feasible alternatives, preference shall be given to natural production.

(g) The protection of, and increase in, the naturally spawning salmon and steelhead trout of the state must be accomplished primarily through the improvement of stream habitat.

(h) Funds provided by the Legislature since 1978 to further the protection and increase of the fisheries of the state have been administered by the department in a successful program of contracts with local government and nonprofit agencies and private groups in ways that have attracted substantial citizen effort.

(i) The department’s contract program has demonstrated that California has a large and enthusiastic corps of citizens that are eager to further the restoration
 of the stream and fishery resources of this state and that are willing to provide significant amounts of time and labor to that purpose.

(j) There is need for a comprehensive salmon, steelhead trout, and anadromous fisheries plan, program, and state government organization to guide the state’s efforts to protect and increase the naturally spawning salmon, steelhead trout, and anadromous fishery resources of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 82.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6902.

The Legislature, for purposes of this chapter, declares as follows:

(a) It is the policy of the state to significantly increase the natural production of salmon and steelhead trout by the end of this century. The department shall develop a plan and a program that strives to double the current natural production of salmon and steelhead trout resources.

(b) It is the policy of the state to recognize and encourage the participation of the public in privately and publicly funded mitigation, restoration, and enhancement programs in order to protect and increase naturally spawning salmon and steelhead trout resources.

(c) It is the policy of the state that existing natural salmon and steelhead trout habitat shall not be diminished further without offsetting the impacts of the lost habitat.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1545, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

6903.

It is the policy of the state and the department to encourage nonprofit salmon release and return operations subject to this code operated by, or on behalf of, licensed commercial salmon fishermen for the purpose of enhancing California’s salmon populations and increasing the salmon harvest by commercial and recreational fishermen. The department shall, to the extent that funds and personnel are available, cooperate with fishing organizations in the siting and establishment of those operations to ensure the protection of natural spawning stocks of native salmon. The organizations conducting the operations may receive salmon eggs and juvenile salmon for the purposes of the operation, and, where appropriate, shall have priority to receive salmon eggs and juvenile salmon for those purposes after the needs of habitat mitigation efforts, and state hatcheries are met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6903.5.

The department shall encourage other nonprofit hatcheries and nonprofit artificial propagation operations, operated by, or on behalf of, licensed fishermen, for the purpose of rebuilding or enhancing marine fish populations, including, but not limited to, those for Dungeness crab, sea urchin, and California halibut, consistent with the protection of these species in the wild, in order to provide sustainable marine fish populations for harvest by commercial and recreational fishermen. The department shall, to the extent funds and personnel are available, cooperate with these nonprofit hatcheries and nonprofit artificial propagation operations in determining the feasibility, siting, and establishment of those activities and sharing technical information to ensure the protection of the marine environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 984, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [6910. - 6912.]

6910.

Unless the context clearly requires a different meaning, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1545, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

6911.

“Production” means the survival of fish to adulthood as measured by the abundance of the recreational and commercial catch together with the return of fish to the state’s spawning streams.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1545, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

6912.

“Program” means the program for protecting and increasing the naturally spawning salmon and steelhead trout of the state provided for in Article 3 (commencing with Section 6920).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1545, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Salmon, Steelhead Trout, and Anadromous Fisheries Program [6920. - 6923.]

6920.

(a) The department shall, with the advice of the Advisory Committee on Salmon and Steelhead Trout and the Commercial Salmon Trollers Advisory Committee, prepare and maintain a detailed and comprehensive program for the protection and increase of salmon, steelhead trout, and anadromous fisheries.

(b) The department shall consult with every public agency whose policies or decisions may affect the goals of this program to determine if there are feasible means for those public agencies to help the department achieve the goals of this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1545, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

6921.

The program shall identify the measures the department will carry out to achieve the policies set forth in Section 6902.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1545, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

6922.

The program shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following elements:

(a) Identification of streams where the natural production of salmon and steelhead trout can be increased primarily through the improvement of stream and streambank conditions without effect on land ownership, land use practices, or changes in streamflow operations.

(b) Identification of streams where the natural production of salmon and steelhead trout can be increased only through the improvement of land use practices or changes in streamflow operations.

(c) Identification of streams where the protection of, and increase in, salmon and steelhead trout resources require, as a result of significant prior loss of stream habitat, the construction of artificial propagation facilities.

(d) A program element for evaluating the effectiveness of the program.

(e) Recommendations for an organizational structure, staffing, budgeting, long-term sources of funding, changes in state statutes and regulations and federal and local government policy and such other administrative and legislative actions as the department finds to be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(f) Identification of measures to protect and increase the production of other anadromous fisheries consistent with policies set forth in Section 6902.

(g) Identification of alternatives to, or mitigation of, manmade factors which cause the loss of juvenile and adult fish in California’s stream system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1545, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

6923.

Measures which are the responsibility of other agencies or persons, such as the repair or replacement of dysfunctional fish screens, are not eligible for funding under the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1545, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Effect of Reduced Water Flows [6930. - 6930.]

6930.

(a) Subject to the availability of funds for the purposes of this section, the department shall contract with the University of California to conduct a study of the effects that reduced waterflows at the mouths and upstream estuaries of rivers selected under subdivision (b) would have on existing salmon and steelhead populations and on existing or prospective salmon and steelhead population restoration or reintroduction programs.

(b) The department shall select the rivers to be included in the study and shall limit its selection to rivers that are within the combined river systems described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 1215.5 of the Water Code, and that are the subject of an application that has been filed with the State Water Resources Control Board to appropriate water in an amount equal to more than three cubic feet per second or more than 500 acre feet per annum of storage, involving the delivery of water by means other than a pipeline, natural watercourse, well, or aqueduct to any place of use that is outside of the protected area described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 1215.5 of the Water Code.

(c) The findings of the study conducted under this section shall be a factor in any decision of the State Water Resources Control Board to approve or deny an application to appropriate water from any river selected under this section. If the application involves the delivery of water, by means other than a pipeline, natural watercourse, well, or aqueduct, to any place of use that is outside of the protected area described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 1215.5 of the Water Code, the board may not approve that application until after the study has been completed.

(d) Any study conducted pursuant to this section shall conclude within five years of the start of that study.

(e) This section applies to the University of California only if the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, make it applicable to the university.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 681, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. California Monitoring Program [6950. - 6951.]

6950.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Local agencies” means local agencies that have a role in the conservation, restoration, and management of salmonid species.

(b) “Program” means the California Monitoring Program established pursuant to this chapter.

(c) “Relevant agencies” means state and federal agencies that have a role in the conservation, restoration, and management of salmonid species.

(d) “Tribe” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1452.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 455, Sec. 2.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6951.

The department shall establish the California Monitoring Program to collect comprehensive data on anadromous salmonid populations, in coordination with relevant agencies, to inform salmon and steelhead recovery, conservation, and management activities. The department may consult with local agencies, tribes, conservation organizations, and academic institutions to carry out monitoring efforts under the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 455, Sec. 2.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.7. CONSERVATION AND MANAGEMENT OF MARINE LIVING RESOURCES [7050. - 7090.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Policies [7050. - 7051.]

7050.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the Pacific Ocean and its rich marine living resources are of great environmental, economic, aesthetic, recreational, educational, scientific, nutritional, social, and historic importance to the people of California.

(b) It is the policy of the state to ensure the conservation, sustainable use, and, where feasible, restoration of California’s marine living resources for the benefit of all the citizens of the state. The objective of this policy shall be to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Conserve the health and diversity of marine ecosystems and marine living resources.

(2) Allow and encourage only those activities and uses of marine living resources that are sustainable.

(3) Recognize the importance of the aesthetic, educational, scientific, and recreational uses that do not involve the taking of California’s marine living resources.

(4) Recognize the importance to the economy and the culture of California of sustainable sport and commercial fisheries and the development of commercial aquaculture consistent with the marine living resource conservation policies of this part.

(5) Support and promote scientific research on marine ecosystems and their components to develop better information on which to base marine living resource management decisions.

(6) Manage marine living resources on the basis of the best available scientific information and other relevant information that the commission or department possesses or receives.

(7) Involve all interested parties, including, but not limited to, individuals from the sport and commercial fishing industries, aquaculture industries, coastal and ocean tourism and recreation industries, marine conservation organizations, local governments, marine scientists, and the public in marine living resource management decisions.

(8) Promote the dissemination of accurate information concerning the condition of, or management of, marine resources and fisheries by seeking out the best available information and making it available to the public through the marine resources management process.

(9) Coordinate and cooperate with adjacent states, as well as with Mexico and Canada, and encourage regional approaches to management of activities and uses that affect marine living resources. Particular attention shall be paid to coordinated approaches to the management of shared fisheries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.

(a) A regulation adopted pursuant to this part shall apply only to ocean waters and bays. Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, nothing contained in this part grants the department or any other agency of the state any regulatory authority not in existence on January 1, 1999, in any river upstream of the mouth of such river, in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta or in any other estuary.

(b) The policies in this part shall apply only to fishery management plans and regulations adopted by the commission on or after January 1, 1999. No power is delegated to the commission or the department by this part to regulate fisheries other than the nearshore fishery, the white sea bass fishery, emerging fisheries, and fisheries for which the commission or department had regulatory authority prior to January 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Marine Fisheries Generally [7055. - 7059.]

7055.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of the state that:

(a) California’s marine sport and commercial fisheries, and the resources upon which they depend, are important to the people of the state and, to the extent practicable, shall be managed in accordance with the policies and other requirements of this part in order to assure the long-term economic, recreational, ecological, cultural, and social benefits of those fisheries and the marine habitats on which they depend.

(b) Programs for the conservation and management of the marine fishery resources of California shall be established and administered to prevent overfishing, to rebuild depressed stocks, to ensure conservation, to facilitate long-term protection and, where feasible, restoration of marine fishery habitats, and to achieve the sustainable use of the state’s fishery resources.

(c) Where a species is the object of sportfishing, a sufficient resource shall be maintained to support a reasonable sport use, taking into consideration the necessity of regulating individual sport fishery bag limits to the quantity that is sufficient to provide a satisfying sport.

(d) The growth of commercial fisheries, including distant-water fisheries, shall be encouraged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7056.

In order to achieve the primary fishery management goal of sustainability, every sport and commercial marine fishery under the jurisdiction of the state shall be managed under a system whose objectives include all of the following:

(a) The fishery is conducted sustainably so that long-term health of the resource is not sacrificed in favor of short-term benefits. In the case of a fishery managed on the basis of maximum sustainable yield, management shall have optimum yield as its objective.

(b) The health of marine fishery habitat is maintained and, to the extent feasible, habitat is restored, and where appropriate, habitat is enhanced.

(c) Depressed fisheries are rebuilt to the highest sustainable yields consistent with environmental and habitat conditions.

(d) The fishery limits bycatch to acceptable types and amounts, as determined for each fishery.

(e) The fishery management system allows fishery participants to propose methods to prevent or reduce excess effort in marine fisheries.

(f) Management of a species that is the target of both sport and commercial fisheries or of a fishery that employs different gears is closely coordinated.

(g) Fishery management decisions are adaptive and are based on the best available scientific information and other relevant information that the commission or department possesses or receives, and the commission and department have available to them essential fishery information on which to base their decisions.

(h) The management decisionmaking process is open and seeks the advice and assistance of interested parties so as to consider relevant information, including local knowledge.

(i) The fishery management system observes the long-term interests of people dependent on fishing for food, livelihood, or recreation.

(j) The adverse impacts of fishery management on small-scale fisheries, coastal communities, and local economies are minimized.

(k) Collaborative and cooperative approaches to management, involving fishery participants, marine scientists, and other interested parties are strongly encouraged, and appropriate mechanisms are in place to resolve disputes such as access, allocation, and gear conflicts.

(l) The management system is proactive and responds quickly to changing environmental conditions and market or other socioeconomic factors and to the concerns of fishery participants.

(m) The management system is periodically reviewed for effectiveness in achieving sustainability goals and for fairness and reasonableness in its interaction with people affected by management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7058.

Any fishery management regulation adopted by the commission shall, to the extent practicable, conform to the policies of Sections 7055 and 7056.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 559, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7059.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Successful marine life and fishery management is a collaborative process that requires a high degree of ongoing communication and participation of all those involved in the management process, particularly the commission, the department, and those who represent the people and resources that will be most affected by fishery management decisions, especially fishery participants and other interested parties.

(2) In order to maximize the marine science expertise applied to the complex issues of marine life and fishery management, the commission and the department are encouraged to continue to, and to find creative new ways to, contract with or otherwise effectively involve Sea Grant staff, marine scientists, economists, collaborative factfinding process and dispute resolution specialists, and others with the necessary expertise at colleges, universities, private institutions, and other agencies.

(3) The benefits of the collaborative process required by this section apply to most marine life and fishery management activities including, but not limited to, the development and implementation of research plans, marine managed area plans, fishery management plans, and plan amendments, and the preparation of fishery status reports such as those required by Section 7065.

(4) Because California is a large state with a long coast, and because travel is time consuming and costly, the involvement of interested parties shall be facilitated, to the extent practicable, by conducting meetings and discussions in the areas of the coast and in ports where those most affected are concentrated.

(b) In order to fulfill the intent of subdivision (a), the commission and the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Periodically review marine life and fishery management operations with a view to improving communication, collaboration, and dispute resolution, seeking advice from interested parties as part of the review.

(2) Develop a process for the involvement of interested parties and for factfinding and dispute resolution processes appropriate to each element in the marine life and fishery management process. Models to consider include, but are not limited to, the take reduction teams authorized under the Marine Mammal Protection Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1361 et seq.) and the processes that led to improved management in the California herring, sea urchin, prawn, angel shark, and white seabass fisheries.

(3) Consider the appropriateness of various forms of fisheries comanagement, which involves close cooperation between the department and fishery participants, when developing and implementing fishery management plans.

(4) When involving fishery participants in the management process, give particular consideration to the gear used, involvement of sport or commercial sectors or both sectors, and the areas of the coast where the fishery is conducted in order to ensure adequate involvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 483, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Fisheries Science [7060. - 7062.]

7060.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that for the purposes of sustainable fishery management and this part, essential fishery information is necessary for federally and state-managed marine fisheries important to the people of this state to provide sustainable economic and recreational benefits to the people of California. The Legislature further finds and declares that acquiring essential fishery information can best be accomplished through the ongoing cooperation and collaboration of participants in fisheries.

(b) The department, to the extent feasible, shall conduct and support research to obtain essential fishery information for all marine fisheries managed by the state.

(c) The department, to the maximum extent practicable and consistent with Section 7059, shall encourage the participation of fishermen in fisheries research within a framework that ensures the objective collection and analysis of data, the collaboration of fishermen in research design, and the cooperation of fishermen in carrying out research.

(d) The department may apply for grants to conduct research and may enter into contracts or issue competitive grants to public or private research institutions to conduct research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7062.

(a) The department shall establish a program for external peer review of the scientific basis of marine living resources management documents. The department, in its discretion and unless otherwise required by this part, may submit to peer review, documents that include, but are not limited to, fishery management plans and plan amendments, marine resource and fishery research plans.

(b) The department may enter into an agreement with one or more outside entities that are significantly involved with researching and understanding marine fisheries and are not advocacy organizations. These entities may include, but not be limited to, the Sea Grant program of any state, the University of California, the California State University, the Pacific States Marine Fisheries Commission, or any other entity approved by the commission to select and administer peer review panels, as needed. The peer review panels shall be composed of individuals with technical expertise specific to the document to be reviewed. The entity with which the department enters into an agreement for a peer review shall be responsible for the scientific integrity of the peer review process. Each peer reviewer may be compensated as needed to ensure competent peer review. Peer reviewers shall not be employees or officers of the department or the commission and shall not have participated in the development of the document to be reviewed.

(c) The external peer review entity, within the timeframe and budget agreed upon by the department and the external scientific peer review entity, shall provide the department with the written report of the peer review panel that contains an evaluation of the scientific basis of the document. If the report finds that the department has failed to demonstrate that a scientific portion of the document is based on sound scientific knowledge, methods, and practices, the report shall state that finding, and the reasons for the finding. The department may accept the finding, in whole or in part, and may revise the scientific portions of the document accordingly. If the department disagrees with any aspect of the finding of the external scientific peer review, it shall explain, and include as part of the record, its basis for arriving at such a determination in the analysis prepared for the adoption of the final document, including the reasons why it has determined that the scientific portions of the document are based on sound scientific knowledge, methods, or practice. The department shall submit the external scientific peer review report to the commission with any peer reviewed document that is to be adopted or approved by the commission.

(d) The requirements of this section do not apply to any emergency regulation adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(e) Nothing is this section shall be interpreted, in any way, to limit the authority of the commission or department to adopt a plan or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Commission and Department [7065. - 7066.]

7065.

(a) The director shall report annually in writing to the commission on the status of sport and commercial marine fisheries managed by the state. The date of the report shall be chosen by the commission with the advice of the department. Each annual report shall cover at least one-fourth of the marine fisheries managed by the state so that every fishery will be reported on at least once every four years. The department shall, consistent with Section 7059, involve expertise from outside the department in compiling information for the report, which may include, but need not be limited to, Sea Grant staff, other marine scientists, fishery participants, and other interested parties.

(b) For each fishery reported on in an annual report, the report shall include information on landings, fishing effort, areas where the fishery occurs, and other factors affecting the fishery as determined by the department and the commission. Each restricted access program shall be reviewed at least every five years for consistency with the policies of the commission on restricted access fisheries.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the first annual report shall be presented to the commission on or before September 1, 2001, and shall cover all the marine fisheries managed by the state. To the extent that the requirements of this section and Section 7073 are duplicative, the first annual report may be combined with the plan required pursuant to Section 7073.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 483, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7066.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a number of human-caused and natural factors can affect the health of marine fishery resources and result in marine fisheries that do not meet the policies and other requirements of this part.

(b) To the extent feasible, the director’s report to the commission pursuant to Section 7065 shall identify any marine fishery that does not meet the sustainability policies of this part. In the case of a fishery identified as being depressed, the report shall indicate the causes of the depressed condition of the fishery, describe steps being taken to rebuild the fishery, and, to the extent practicable, recommend additional steps to rebuild the fishery.

(c) The director’s report to the commission pursuant to Section 7065, consistent with subdivision (m) of Section 7056, shall evaluate the management system and may recommend modifications of that system to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 483, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Fishery Management Plans—General Policies [7070. - 7074.]

7070.

The Legislature finds and declares that the critical need to conserve, utilize, and manage the state’s marine fish resources and to meet the policies and other requirements stated in this part require that the state’s fisheries be managed by means of fishery management plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1052, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.
